District of Columbia statutes.
47-4474

Redemption of property.

(a)

A person whose property has been levied upon shall have the right to pay the amount due, together with the expenses of the proceeding, if any, to the Mayor at any time before the sale of the property, and upon the payment, the Mayor shall restore the property to him, and all further proceedings in connection with the levy on the property shall cease.

(b)

(1)

The owners of real property sold as provided in this chapter; their heirs, executors, or administrators; any person having an interest in or a lien on the property; or any person on their behalf, shall be permitted to redeem the property sold at any time within 180 days after the sale.

(2)

The property may be redeemed upon payment to the purchaser (or if the purchaser cannot be found, to the Mayor), for the use of the purchaser, his heirs, or assigns, the amount paid by the purchaser and interest thereon at the rate of 18% per year.

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 405(b), 48 DCR 334
This section is referenced in § 47-4475.